New York, session 2025-2026, S10184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. State seal of artistic achievement. 1. (a) The state seal of 4 artistic achievement is established to recognize high school graduates 5 who have attained a high level of proficiency in music, dance, theater, 6 visual arts or media arts. The state seal of artistic achievement shall 7 be awarded by the commissioner. School district participation in this 8 program is voluntary. 9 (b) The purposes of the state seal of artistic achievement are as 10 follows: 11 (1) To encourage pupils to study the arts. 12 (2) To provide employers with a method of identifying people with 13 artistic skills. 14 (3) To provide universities with an additional method to recognize 15 applicants seeking admission. 16 (4) To prepare pupils with twenty-first century skills. 17 (5) To recognize the value of arts instruction in public schools. 18 2. (a) The state seal of artistic achievement certifies attainment of 19 a high level of proficiency by a graduating high school pupil in one or 20 more artistic areas of study. The five artistic areas of study for which 21 a pupil may be awarded a seal of artistic achievement are: music, dance, 22 theater, visual arts and media arts. 23 (b) The board of regents shall promulgate such regulations of the 24 commissioner as may be necessary to establish the criteria that students 25 must achieve to earn a state seal of artistic achievement. Criteria for 26 achievement must be based upon attainment of units of credit in music, 27 dance, theater, visual arts and media arts beyond the credits required 28 to attain a high school diploma, or the completion of a certain number EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15279-01-6 S. 10184 2 1 of hours in a relevant artistic extracurricular activity. A pupil's GPA 2 and assessment scores shall not be used as a criteria. 3 3. The commissioner shall do both of the following: 4 (a) Prepare and deliver to participating school districts an appropri- 5 ate insignia to be affixed to the diploma and transcript of the pupil 6 indicating that the pupil has been awarded a state seal of artistic 7 achievement by the commissioner. 8 (b) Provide other information they deem necessary for school districts 9 to successfully participate in the program. 10 4. A school district that participates in the program under this 11 section shall do both of the following: 12 (a) Maintain appropriate records in order to identify pupils who have 13 earned a state seal of artistic achievement. 14 (b) Affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma and transcript of 15 each pupil who earns a state seal of artistic achievement. 16 5. No fee shall be charged to a pupil pursuant to this section. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 18 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 19 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 20 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 21 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.